Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 2

Conservators

30-3-201. “Absentee” defined.

As used in this part unless the context otherwise requires, an “absentee” is:

Any person serving in or with the armed forces of the United States, in or with the Red Cross, in or with the merchant marines or otherwise, during any period of time when a state of hostilities exists between the United States and any other power and for one (1) year thereafter, who has been reported or listed as missing in action, interned in a neutral country, beleaguered, besieged or captured by the enemy; and

Any resident of this state, or any person owning property in this state, who disappears under circumstances indicating that the person may have died, either naturally, accidentally or at the hand of another, or may have disappeared as the result of mental derangement, amnesia or other mental cause.

Acts 1972, ch. 785, § 1; T.C.A., § 30-1901.

Cross-References. Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, chapter 16, part 2.

Public administrators, guardians, and trustees, title 30, ch. 1, part 4.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 930, 931.

30-3-202. Jurisdiction — Grounds for appointment.

The chancery or probate court has jurisdiction to appoint a conservator of the estate of an absentee as defined in this part upon a showing that:

The absentee has an interest in any form of property in this state, or is a legal resident of this state, or has a spouse or next of kin who is a legal resident of this state, and the absentee has not provided an adequate power of attorney authorizing another to act in the absentee's behalf with regard to the property or interest or the term of any such power of attorney has expired; and

A necessity exists for providing care for the property or estate of the absentee or care for or judgments concerning the absentee's spouse and children; or if the absentee has no spouse and children, the absentee's mother or father.

Acts 1972, ch. 785, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.) § 30-1902.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 930.

Law Reviews.

Pleadings, Motions and Pre-Trial Procedure, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219 (1974).

30-3-203. Transfer of property without conservatorship.

If the spouse of any person defined as an absentee in § 30-3-201(1), or next of kin if the absentee has no spouse, wishes to sell or transfer any property of the absentee that has a gross value of less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or requires the consent of the absentee in any matter regarding the absentee's children, or in any other matter in which the gross value of the subject matter is less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), the spouse or next of kin may apply to the chancery or probate court for an order authorizing the sale, transfer, or consent, without opening a full conservatorship proceeding as provided by this part. The spouse or next of kin may make the application without the assistance of an attorney.

The application shall be made by petition on the following form, which form shall be made readily available to the applicant by the clerk and master of the chancery court and the clerk of the probate court:

In re: , case number

absentee

PETITION FOR SUMMARY RELIEF

Petitioner, whose residence is (street and number)

(city or town), and (county) Tennessee, and who is the

of the absentee, ,

describe relationship to absentee name

states that the absentee has been (imprisoned or missing in action)

since (date) when (describe details)

Petitioner desires to sell/transfer (describe property)

of the value of because

value give reasons

The terms of sale/transfer are (give terms)

Petitioner requires the consent of the absentee for the purpose of .

Petitioner

State of Tennessee

County of

The above named, (petitioner's name), being by me duly sworn, says the

foregoing petition is true and correct to the best of his/her knowledge and belief.

Notary Public

My commission expires .

The court shall, without hearing or notice, enter an order on the petition if it deems the relief requested in the petition necessary to protect the best interests of the absentee or the absentee's dependents.

The order shall be prima facie evidence of the validity of the proceedings and the authority of the petitioner to make a conveyance or transfer of the property or to give the absentee's consent in any matter prescribed by subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

Acts 1972, ch. 785, § 3; T.C.A., § 30-1903.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 935.

30-3-204. Limited conservatorship for specific property.

If the spouse, or the next of kin if there is no spouse, of any person defined as an absentee under § 30-3-201(1), wishes to sell, lease, or mortgage specific property having a gross value of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more, owned by the absentee or in which the absentee had an interest, or take specific action with respect to the absentee's interest having a gross value of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more, the spouse or next of kin may petition the chancery or probate court for an order authorizing the action with respect to that property or interest.

The petition shall be sworn to by the petitioner and shall state:

The names, addresses, and age of the spouse, children, mother, father, brothers, and sisters, or if none of these are living, the next of kin, of the absentee;

The name, address, and age of any other person who would have an interest in the property or the estate of the absentee if the absentee were deceased;

The exact circumstances that cause the person missing to be an absentee under § 30-3-201, including the date the absentee was first known missing, interned, beleaguered, etc.;

The reasons for the action for which the petition seeks authorization;

Whether or not the person alleged to be an absentee has a will, the whereabouts of the will and contents if known; and

A statement of all property constituting an asset of the alleged absentee's estate or in which the absentee has any interest and the approximate value of that property.

Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given to all persons named in the petition by registered mail or certified mail with return receipt requested.

The judge shall hear evidence on the question of whether the person alleged to be missing, interned, beleaguered, etc., is an absentee as defined by § 30-3-201, and on the question of whether the action in question should be authorized. Any person interested in the proceedings may intervene with leave of the court.

The court may in its discretion appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the alleged absentee at the hearing.

If after hearing, the court is satisfied that the person alleged to be an absentee is an absentee, as defined in § 30-3-201, and that the action in question should be authorized, and that there is no necessity for a full conservatorship as provided by § 30-3-205, the court shall enter an order appointing the petitioner as conservator for the purposes of the action that is the subject of the petition and authorizing the conservator to take the action requested in the petition. The court shall require the conservator to account for the proceeds of the sale, lease, or other action, but the conservator shall not be required to subject the other property of the absentee to a conservatorship proceeding.

The court may retain jurisdiction of the proceeding to make such further orders as it deems proper.

Acts 1972, ch. 785, § 4; T.C.A., § 30-1904.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 935.

30-3-205. Petition for appointment.

The jurisdiction of the court shall be invoked by the filing of a petition by any person who would have an interest in the property or estate of the absentee were the absentee deceased, or any person who is dependent on the absentee for maintenance or support.

The petition shall be sworn to by the petitioner and shall state:

The names, addresses, and age of the spouse, children, mother, father, brothers, and sisters, or if none of these are living, the next of kin, of the absentee;

The name, address, and age of any other person who would have an interest in the property or the estate of the absentee if the absentee were deceased;

The exact circumstances that cause the person missing to be an absentee under § 30-3-201, including the date the absentee was first known missing, interned, beleaguered, etc.;

The necessity for establishing a conservatorship;

Whether or not the person alleged to be an absentee has a will and the whereabouts of the will; and

A statement of all property constituting an asset of the alleged absentee's estate or in which the absentee has any interest and the approximate value of that property.

Acts 1972, ch. 785, § 5; T.C.A., § 30-1905.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 932.

30-3-206. Hearing on petition — Notice — Appointment.

Notice of the hearing on the petition to appoint a conservator shall be given to all persons named in the petition by registered mail, certified mail with return receipt requested or by personal service of legal process.

The judge shall hear evidence on the question of whether the person alleged to be missing, interned, beleaguered, etc., is an absentee as defined by § 30-3-201, and on the question of who is entitled to appointment as conservator. Any person interested in the proceedings may intervene with leave of the court.

The court may in its discretion appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the alleged absentee at the hearing.

If after hearing, the court is satisfied that the person alleged to be an absentee is an absentee, as defined in § 30-3-201, and that it is necessary that a conservatorship be established, the court shall appoint a conservator of the estate and property of the absentee to take charge of the absentee's estate and property under the supervision and subject to the further orders of the court.

In the appointment of a conservator, the court shall give due consideration to the appointment of one (1) of the next of kin of the absentee if the next of kin is a fit and proper person and is qualified to act.

Acts 1972, ch. 785, § 6; 1978, ch. 649, § 1; T.C.A., § 30-1906.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 932.

30-3-207. Oath and bond.

Every conservator, before exercising authority as conservator, shall take oath to faithfully perform the duties of conservator and to render true accounts whenever required according to law, which oath may be administered by any officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of this state. The oath shall be filed with the court.

The court may require the conservator to give bond in the same manner as that required of incompetents as set forth in title 34, chapter 4 [repealed].

Acts 1972, ch. 785, §§ 7, 8; T.C.A., §§ 30-1907, 30-1908.

Compiler's Notes. Title 34, chapter 4, referred to in this section, has been repealed. For present provisions governing guardian's and conservator's bonds, see §§ 34-1-105, 34-5-110, 34-6-106.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 933.

30-3-208. Duties.

The conservator shall have all the rights, powers, and duties of a guardian of the property as established in title 34, chapters 1 and 2, and an absentee and an absentee's dependents shall be entitled to all benefits accruing to a ward or a ward's dependents under those chapters. The court shall have the same responsibility as to a conservatorship as with respect to the guardianship of the property under those chapters.

Acts 1972, ch. 785, § 9; T.C.A., § 30-1909.

Compiler's Notes. Title 34, chapter 3, referred to in this section, has been repealed. For present provisions governing guardian's and conservator's bonds, see §§ 34-1-105, 34-5-110, 34-6-106.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 933.

30-3-209. Resignation and discharge.

The provision for resignation and discharge of conservators for estates of incompetents as set forth in § 34-4-113 [repealed] shall apply in the chancery or probate court for the resignation and discharge of a conservator appointed under this part.

Acts 1972, ch. 785, § 10; T.C.A., § 30-1910.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 34-4-113, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 794, effective January 1, 1993. For new provisions, see title 34, chapter 1.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 933.

30-3-210. Termination of conservatorship.

At any time upon petition signed by the absentee, or on petition of an attorney in fact acting under an adequate power of attorney granted by the absentee, the court shall direct the termination of the conservatorship and the transfer of all property held under the conservatorship to the absentee or to the designated attorney in fact.

Likewise, if at any time subsequent to the appointment of a conservator it appears that the absentee has died and a personal representative has been appointed for the absentee's estate, the court shall direct the termination of the conservatorship and the transfer of all property of the deceased absentee held under the conservatorship to the personal representative.

When the need for a conservatorship terminates, the conservator shall promptly file final accountings and application for discharge with the court. If it appears to the court that the accountings are correct and that the conservator has made full and complete transfer of the absentee's assets as directed, the court may approve the accountings and discharge the conservator. If objections to the accountings are filed, the judge shall conduct a hearing under the same conditions for a hearing on objections to annual accountings.

The discharge shall operate as a release from the duties of the conservatorship and as a bar to any suit against the conservator or the conservator's surety, unless the suit is commenced within one (1) year from the date of discharge.

Acts 1972, ch. 785, § 11; T.C.A., § 30-1911; Acts 1985, ch. 140, § 24.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 934.